Washington statutes.
RCW 36.78.020

Definitions—"Standards of good practice."

"Standards of good practice" shall mean general and uniform practices formulated and adopted by the board relating to the administration of county roads and the safe and efficient movement of people and goods over county roads, which shall apply to engineering, design procedures, maintenance, traffic control, safety, planning, programming, road classification, road inventories, budgeting and accounting procedures, management practices, equipment policies, personnel policies, and effective use of transportation-related information technology.

[ 1993 c 65 s 1; 1991 c 363 s 82; 1965 ex.s. c 120 s 2.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.